Utah statutes.
17-30-21.   Power of commission members to administer oaths and subpoena witnesses -- Rights of, and fees for, witnesses.

(1) Any member of a commission, in performance of his duties as such, shall have power to administer oaths and subpoena witnesses and documents. If a person refuses to [or] fails to obey a subpoena issued by a commissioner, the district court may, upon application of a commissioner, compel obedience as in like cases before the district court.

(2)  Witnesses in proceedings before a commission shall be subject to all the rights, privileges, duties and penalties of witnesses in courts of record, and shall be paid the same fees, as an expense of the commission.



Enacted by Statewide Initiative A, Nov. 8, 1960

